Connecticut, session 2026, HB05453.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Administrative
2 Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Emergency Services
3 and Public Protection and the Labor Commissioner, shall conduct a
4 study to (1) determine whether a state-wide "essential worker" or "first
5 responder" job classification should be established, and (2) if so, (A)
6 determine what effect, if any, such classifications would have on the jobs
7 that fit within such classifications, including, but not limited to, any
8 effect on employee benefits or the requirements applicable to such jobs,
9 (B) develop definitions of such classifications, and (C) determine
10 whether telecommunicators, as defined in section 28-30 of the general
11 statutes, and employees of public works departments, as defined in
12 section 31-57s of the general statutes, should be classified as essential
13 workers or first responders. Not later than January 1, 2027, the
14 Commissioner of Administrative Services shall submit a report, in
HB5453 / File No. 271 1

HB5453 File No. 271
15 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
16 concerning the results of such study to the joint standing committee of
17 the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
18 safety and security.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
PS Joint Favorable
HB5453 / File No. 271 2

HB5453 File No. 271
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which results in no fiscal impact, requires the Department of
Administrative Services to conduct a study regarding state-wide
essential worker and first responder job classifications.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5453 / File No. 271 3

HB5453 File No. 271
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5453
AN ACT REQUIRING A STUDY REGARDING STATE-WIDE
ESSENTIAL WORKER AND FIRST RESPONDER JOB
CLASSIFICATIONS.